Hawaii, session 2025, GM1283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the Ala Wai canal
2 was built in the 1920s and is the largest artificial waterway in
3 the State. Floating debris in the canal has been a persistent
4 problem, which severely harms recreational users and the State's
5 aquatic habitats in nearshore waters. In October 2024, heavy
6 rain in the watershed area caused serious concerns for
7 downstream tenants, including those at the Ala Wai small boat
8 harbor. The legislature recognizes that the division of boating
9 and ocean recreation of the department of land and natural
10 resources has spent hundreds of thousands of dollars to collect
11 and dispose of the floating debris at the Ala Wai small boat
12 harbor. However, more funding and assistance is needed to
13 better manage floating debris in the Ala Wai canal.
14 Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate
15 funds to the university of Hawaii to:
2025-2889 SB1146 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO. s"
C.D. 1
1 (1) Develop an action plan and pre-engineering concept
2 plan to help with debris management and water quality
3 control in the Ala Wai watershed; and
4 (2) Establish two graduate assistant positions to assist
5 with the action plan and pre-engineering concept plan.
6 SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
7 revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $425,000 or so much
8 thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
9 sum of $150,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for
10 fiscal year 2026-2027 for:
11 (1) The development of an action plan and pre-engineering
12 concept plan to help with debris management and water
13 quality control in the Ala Wai watershed;
14 (2) The university of Hawaii to establish two graduate
15 assistant positions to assist with the action plan and
16 pre-engineering concept plan;
17 (3) Partial summer overload support for faculty mentors
18 providing oversight of the student project teams; and
19 (4) Other current expenses.
20 The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university
21 of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act.
2025-2889 SB1146 CDl SMA-l.docx
iRiimiiiMimMH

Page 3
S.B. NO. s"
C.D. 1
I SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-2889 SB1146 CDl SMA-l.docx 3
imMiiiiiNNiiimiina

S.B. NO. 1146
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 6th day of June .2025

S.B. No. 1146, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
195

SB No. 1146, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives